Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 2. Administration.

Sec. 24.45.021.
Administration.

This chapter shall be administered by the Alaska Public Offices Commission created under AS

15.13.020(a)

.

The commission shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska public offices commission complaints and investigations, see 2 AAC 50, art. 3.

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 24.45.030.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 167 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 24.45.031.
Powers and duties.

In addition to its other duties under this chapter, the commission shall

prescribe the forms for registration, reports, statements, notices, and other documents required by this chapter;

prepare and publish instructions setting out the methods of accounting, bookkeeping, and preservation of records required to facilitate compliance with and enforcement of this chapter and explaining the duties of persons subject to the provisions of this chapter; the instructions shall be updated periodically;

provide assistance to persons in complying with the provisions of this chapter;

prepare and publish a biennial report of its activities, findings, and recommendations under this chapter, which shall be made available to the governor, legislature, and to the public by February 1 of each odd-numbered calendar year; the commission shall notify the legislature that the report is available;

report suspected violations of this chapter to the attorney general;

administer an annually updated training course that promotes adherence to high ethical standards of professional conduct and teaches lobbyists and employers of lobbyists how to comply with laws that regulate lobbyists.

The commission may

hold hearings and conduct investigations into compliance with the provisions of this chapter;

in conjunction with (1) of this subsection, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, administer oaths and affirmations, and require the production of books, papers, records, documents, or other items material to the commission’s duties or powers under this chapter;

prepare, publish, and make available to the public, periodic, but at least biannually, summaries of the statements and reports received; these summaries shall list separately individual lobbyists and employers of lobbyists.

History.

(§ 2 ch 167 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 50 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 10 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 11 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.